Utah statutes.
20A-1-302.   Opening and closing of polls on election day.
(1)  Polls at all elections on the date of the election shall open at 7 a.m.
and shall remain open until 8 p.m. of the same day.
(2)  The election judges shall allow every voter who arrives at the polls by 8
p.m. to vote.
